District of Columbia statutes.
38-3001

Adopted; District membership in Commission approved.

The District of Columbia adopts the Compact for Education of the Education Commission of the States (“Compact”) and becomes a member of the Education Commission of the States (“Commission”).

Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-65, § 2, 31 DCR 198
1981 Ed., § 31-2301.
Short title: The first section of D.C. Law 5-65 provided: “That this act may be cited as ‘Education Commission of the States Participation Act of 1983’.”
Complementary Legislation: Ala.—Code 1975, §§  16-44-1 to 16-44-3. Alaska.—AS 14.44.050 to 14.44.060. Ariz.—A.R.S. § 15-1901. Ark.—A.C.A. §§ 6-4-201 to 6-4-203. Cal.—West’s Ann. Cal.Educ.Code, §§ 12510 to 12515.5. Colo.—West’s C.R.S.A. §§ 24-60-1201 to 24-60-1204. Conn.—C.G.S.A. §§ 10-374 to 10-376. Del.—14 Del.C. §§ 8201, 8211. D.C.—D.C. Official Code, 2001 Ed. §§ 38-3001 to 38-3004. Fla.—West’s F.S.A. §§ 1000.31 to 1000.39. Ga.— O.C.G.A. §§ 20-6-20 to 20-6-24. Hawaii—H R S §§ 311-1 to 311-6. Idaho—I.C. §§ 33-4101 to 33-4103. Ill.—S.H.A. 45 ILCS 90/0.01 to 90/4. Iowa—I.C.A. §§ 272B.1 to 272B.3. Kan.—K.S.A. 72-6011 to 72-6014. Ky.—KRS 156.710, 156. 720. La.—LSA-R.S. 17:1911 to 17:1913. Maine—20-A M.R.S.A. §§ 601 to 609. Md.—Code, Education, §§ 25-101 to 25-104. Mass.—M.G.L.A. c. 69 App., §§ 1-1 to 1-3. Mich.—M.C.L.A. §§ 388.1301 to 388.1304. Minn.—M.S.A. §§ 127A.80, 127A.81. Miss.—Code 1972, §§ 37-135-11 to 37-135-15. Mo.—V.A.M.S. §§ 173.300 to 173.330, 173.715 to 173.721. Nev.—N.R.S. 399.015. N.H.—RSA 200-G:1 to 200-G:3. N.J.—N.J.S.A. 18A:75-1 to 18A:75-12. N.M.—NMSA 1978, §§ 11-8-1 to 11-8-11. N.Y.—McKinney’s Education Law, § 107. Ohio—R.C. §§ 3301.48, 3301.49. Okl.—70 Okl.St.Ann. §§ 506.1 to 506.3. Pa.—24 P.S. §§ 5401 to 5403. Puerto Rico—18 L.P.R.A. §§ 1221 to 1226. R.I.—Gen.Laws. 1956, § 16-47-1. S.C.—Code 1976, §§ 59-11-10 to 59-11-30. Tenn.—T.C.A. §§ 49-12-201 to 49-12-203. Tex.—V.T.C.A., Education Code §§ 161.01 to 161.04. Virgin Islands—17 V.I.C. §§ 551 to 559. Va.—Code 1950, §§ 22.1-336 to 22.1-338. W.Va.—Code, 18-10D-1 to 18-10D-7. Wis.—W.S.A. 39.75, 39.76. Wyo.—Wyo.Stat.Ann. §§ 21-16-301, 21-16-302.